Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.40.230

Limitations on employers or labor organizations. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) No employer or labor organization may increase the salary of an officer or employee, or compensate an officer, employee, or other person or entity, with the intention that the increase in salary, or the compensation, or a part of it, be contributed or spent to support or oppose a candidate, state official against whom recall charges have been filed, political party, or political committee.

(2) No employer or labor organization may discriminate against an officer or employee in the terms or conditions of employment for (a) the failure to contribute to, (b) the failure in any way to support or oppose, or (c) in any way supporting or opposing a candidate, ballot proposition, political party, or political committee. At least annually, an employee from whom wages or salary are withheld under subsection (3) of this section shall be notified of the provisions of this subsection.

(3) No employer or other person or entity responsible for the disbursement of funds in payment of wages or salaries may withhold or divert a portion of an employee's wages or salaries for contributions to political committees or for use as political contributions except upon the written request of the employee. The request must be made on a form prescribed by the commission informing the employee of the prohibition against employer and labor organization discrimination described in subsection (2) of this section. The employee may revoke the request at any time. At least annually, the employee shall be notified about the right to revoke the request.

(4) Each person or entity who withholds contributions under subsection (3) of this section shall maintain open for public inspection for a period of no less than three years, during normal business hours, documents and books of accounts that shall include a copy of each employee's request, the amounts and dates funds were actually withheld, and the amounts and dates funds were transferred to a political committee. Copies of such information shall be delivered to the commission upon request.

[ 2024 c 164 s 465; 2010 c 204 s 613; 2002 c 156 s 1; 1993 c 2 s 8 (Initiative Measure No. 134, approved November 3, 1992). Formerly RCW 42.17A.495, 42.17.680.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—2002 c 156: "This act takes effect July 1, 2002." [ 2002 c 156 s 2.]

Short title—1993 c 2: See note following RCW 29B.40.010.